Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.18.060

Venue.

Suit upon causes of action arising against the said nonadmitted organizations shall be brought in the county where the property is situated which is the subject of the mortgage purchased by the said nonadmitted organizations. If the property covered by the said mortgage is situated in more than one county, venue may be had in any of said counties where the property lies.

[ 1989 c 165 s 196.]